Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.060

Vacancies—Compensation.

(1) In the event a position becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the position until the next annual meeting shall be filled by vote of the remaining members of the commission. At the annual meeting a commissioner shall be elected to fill the balance of the unexpired term.

(2) Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when on official commission business.

[ 2001 c 314 s 6.]